California statutes. Education Code
(B) The election shall be effective six months after the date the notification is received by the board, provided that both the retired member and the retired member’s designated spouse or registered domestic partner are then living. If, before the new election becomes effective, the member terminates his or her benefit pursuant to Section 24208 or the retired member or the new option beneficiary dies, the new election is void and the election pursuant to subdivision (c) remains in effect.

(2) The election of the option and designation of the option beneficiary under this section shall result in an actuarial modification of the member’s retirement
 allowance that shall be payable through the life of the member and the member’s new spouse or registered domestic partner. Modification of the member’s retirement allowance pursuant to this subdivision shall be based on the ages of the retired member and the retired member’s new spouse or registered domestic partner as of the effective date of the election and shall not be in conflict with the final decree of dissolution, judgment of nullity, order of separate maintenance, or property settlement agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 416, Sec. 17.   (SB 1165)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

24323.

(a) If an option beneficiary designated in the election of an Option 2 or Option 3 as described in Section 24300 predeceases the retired member, the retired member may elect a new joint and survivor option described in paragraph (1), (2), (3), or (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 24300.1 and designate one or multiple new option beneficiaries.

(b) If an option beneficiary designated in the election of an Option 4 or Option 5 as described in Section 24300 predeceases the retired member, a retirement allowance adjusted for the specified option shall be payable to the retired member and shall commence to accrue to the retired member as of the day
 following the date of the death of the option beneficiary. The retired member may elect a new joint and survivor option described in paragraph (1), (2), (3), or (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 24300.1 and designate one or multiple new option beneficiaries.

(c) If an option beneficiary designated in the election of Option 2 or Option 3 within Option 8 as described in Section 24300 predeceases the retired member, the retired member may elect a new joint and survivor option described in paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 24300.1 and designate a new option beneficiary for the portion of the retirement allowance that was modified for the prior option beneficiary. The retired member may not elect the compound option described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 24300.1.

(d) If an option beneficiary designated in the election of Option 4 or Option 5 within Option 8 as described in Section 24300 predeceases the retired member, a retirement allowance adjusted for the specified option for the portion of the benefit allocated to that beneficiary shall be payable to the retired member and shall commence to accrue to the retired member as of the day following the date of the death of the option beneficiary. The retired member may elect a new joint and survivor option described in paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 24300.1 for that portion of the retirement allowance that was modified for the prior option beneficiary and designate a new option beneficiary. The retired member may not elect the compound option described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 24300.1.

(e) If
 an option beneficiary designated in the election of an Option 6 or Option 7 or in the election of Option 6 or Option 7 within Option 8, pursuant to Section 24300 predeceases the retired member, that portion of the retirement allowance attributable to Option 6 or Option 7 without modification for the option shall be payable to the retired member upon notification to the board and shall commence to accrue to the retired member as of the day following the date of the death of the option beneficiary. The retired member may designate a new beneficiary for that portion of the retirement allowance within the same option designated for the prior beneficiary.

(f) If an option beneficiary designated in the election of an option pursuant to paragraph (1), (2), (3), or (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 24300.1 predeceases the retired member, that portion
 of the retirement allowance attributable to the option without modification for the option shall be payable to the member upon notification to the board and shall commence to accrue to the
 retired member as of the day following the date of the death of the option beneficiary. The retired member may designate a new beneficiary for that portion of the retirement allowance within the same option designated for the prior beneficiary.

(g) The retired member shall submit proof of death of the prior beneficiary before making a new beneficiary election under this section. The effective date of any new election under this section shall be six months following the date notification is received by the board provided both the retired member and the newly designated option beneficiary are living on the date the new election is to become effective. Notification shall be on a properly executed form prescribed by the system for the new designation.

(h) If, before the new
 election becomes effective, the member reinstates pursuant to Section 24208 or the retired member or new option beneficiary dies, the new election is void.

(i) If the retired member is eligible to elect a new option and the effective date of the new option election is on or after January 1, 2007, at the time of the new election the retired member shall elect an option from the options described in Section 24300.1.

(j) The election of the new joint and survivor option under this section and Section 24300.1 is subject to an actuarial modification of the retirement allowance. In no event may a retired member elect a joint and survivor option that would result in any additional liability to the fund.

(k) The new option
 beneficiary cannot be an existing option beneficiary for that member designated under paragraph (7) of subdivision (a) of Section 24300 or paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 24300.1.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 24306 by Stats. 2014, Ch. 755, Sec. 53.   (SB 1220)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

24324.

(a) A member who is receiving a joint and survivor annuity under the Defined Benefit Supplement Program may change the annuity or the annuity beneficiary elected pursuant to Section 25011, 25011.1, 25018, or 25018.1, provided all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The annuity beneficiary is the member’s spouse or former spouse.

(2) A final decree of dissolution of marriage is granted, or a judgment of nullity is entered, or an order of separate maintenance is made by a court of competent jurisdiction with respect to the member and the spouse or former spouse on or after the
 beginning of the initial plan year designated by the board pursuant to Section
 22156.05.

(3) The change is consistent with the final decree of dissolution, judgment of nullity, or order of separate maintenance.

(b) A member may change the annuity pursuant to subdivision (a) before or after the first annuity payment is issued.

(c) The member shall notify the system in writing of the change in the annuity. The notification shall not be earlier than the effective date of the final decree of dissolution, judgment of nullity, or order of separate maintenance and shall include a certified copy of the final decree of dissolution, judgment of nullity, or order of separate maintenance, and any property settlement agreement.

(d) A change in
 the annuity or annuity beneficiary or both shall become effective on the date the notification of change is received by the system. The annuity amount payable to the member upon the change elected by the member shall be determined as of the effective date of the change and shall be the actuarial equivalent of the lump sum that would otherwise be payable to the member as of the date of the change. If the member elects a joint and survivor annuity, the amount payable under the annuity shall be modified consistent with the annuity elected by the member.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 24305.3 (as amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 655, Sec. 39) by Stats. 2014, Ch. 755, Sec. 50.   (SB 1220)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

24330.

(a) The election of an option as provided in Section 24307 shall preclude the payment of a family allowance to any beneficiary under this part.

(b) The preretirement election of an option made by the member pursuant to Section 24307 shall be voided by the board as of the effective date of an approved disability retirement under this part. Members receiving a disability retirement allowance pursuant to Chapter 26 (commencing with Section 24100) may not file an election of option as provided in Section 24307.

(c) The election of an option as provided in Section 24307 shall preclude the
 payment of a survivor benefit allowance pursuant to Chapter 23 (commencing with Section 23850) and shall preclude the payment of the remaining balance of the member’s accumulated retirement contributions prior to the death of the option beneficiary.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 24308 by Stats. 2014, Ch. 755, Sec. 57.   (SB 1220)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

24331.

(a) An option beneficiary or a trustee or beneficiary of a trust that is an option beneficiary who is receiving an allowance pursuant to the option elected by the member may designate a beneficiary to receive any allowance that has accrued and is unpaid, and any remaining balance of the retired member’s accumulated retirement contributions payable pursuant to Section 23881, upon the death of the option beneficiary.

(b) Unless otherwise specified in the trust instrument, the trustee of the trust that is an option beneficiary is entitled to name a subsequent beneficiary if the trust is valid. If the trust is determined to be invalid or terminates, any election by the trustee pursuant to this division shall be void and the
 beneficiary shall be entitled to exercise all rights provided to option beneficiaries under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 559, Sec. 10.   (AB 1875)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

24332.

(a) A member upon application for a disability retirement pursuant to Chapter 26 (commencing with Section 24100), may elect, as provided in Section 24300 or 24300.1 to receive an actuarially modified disability retirement allowance.

(b) For purposes of this section, the member shall either elect to receive an unmodified allowance or designate an option beneficiary on a properly executed form prescribed by the system, either of which shall be filed with the system on or before the last day of the month in which the member’s disability retirement is approved by the system. The option shall become effective on the effective date of the disability retirement allowance. The modification of
 the disability retirement allowance under the option elected shall be based on the ages of the retired member and the designated option beneficiary as of the effective date of the disability retirement. The modification shall be applicable only to the disability retirement allowance payable pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 24106.

(c) Except as provided in Sections 24300, 24300.1, 24320, 24321, 24322, and 24323, a member may revoke or change an election of an option no later than 30 days from the date of the member’s initial disability retirement benefit payment.

(d) If a member dies prior to electing an unmodified allowance or an option, the death benefits shall be payable under Chapter 23 (commencing with Section 23850), regardless of whether the disability retirement
 application is or would have been approved.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 24301 by Stats. 2014, Ch. 755, Sec. 45.   (SB 1220)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

24333.

Upon termination of a disability retirement allowance pursuant to Section 24117, any option elected at the time of retirement pursuant to Section 24332 shall be void as of the effective date of the reinstatement. The preretirement election of option subsequent to termination of the allowance pursuant to Section 24117 shall be subject to the following:

(a) A member may not make a preretirement election of option pursuant to Section 24307 prior to becoming qualified to make application for service retirement under Section 24201 or 24203.

(b) A member who was receiving an unmodified disability
 retirement allowance prior to termination of the allowance may not make a preretirement election of option earlier than six months following the date on which the disability retirement allowance was terminated pursuant to Section 24117.

(c) A member who has elected an option pursuant to Section 24332, and is otherwise eligible to make a preretirement election of an option, may make the election anytime during the six months following the date on which the disability retirement allowance was terminated pursuant to Section 24117. The member shall elect the same option and designate the same option beneficiary as designated under Section 24332 when making the election during the six-month period following the date the disability retirement allowance was terminated.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 24304 by Stats. 2014, Ch. 755, Sec. 48.   (SB 1220)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

24340.

(a) A member who has a preretirement election of an option in effect on December 31, 1990, may change his or her preretirement election of Option 2, Option 3, Option 4, or Option 5 to either Option 6 or Option 7 without the allowance reduction prescribed in Sections 24309 and 24310, provided the change is made on or after January 1, 1991, and prior to the earlier of January 1, 1992, or the member’s retirement under this part.

(b) If the member elects to change his or her option under this section, then the member shall retain the same option beneficiary as named in the prior preretirement election. The election to change the preretirement election under this section shall be void if not received
 in the system’s headquarters office at least 30 days prior to the death of the option beneficiary.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 24311 by Stats. 2014, Ch. 755, Sec. 60.   (SB 1220)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

24341.

(a) A member who retired for service under Option 2 or Option 3 with an effective date prior to January 1, 1991, may elect to change Option 2 to Option 6 or Option 3 to Option 7 under all of the following conditions:

(1) The election is made during the six-month period commencing July 1, 1994, and ending December 31, 1994.

(2) The same beneficiary under Option 2 or Option 3 is named as beneficiary under Option 6 or Option 7.

(3) The change in options is consistent with Sections 22453 and 24322.

(4) The option beneficiary is not afflicted with any known terminal illness and the retired member shall state under penalty of perjury that to the best of his or her knowledge the option beneficiary is not afflicted with any known terminal illness.

(5) The option beneficiary has not predeceased the retired member as of the effective date of the change in options.

(b) The change in options shall be effective on the date the election is signed, provided that the election is received at the system’s headquarters office within 30 days after the date of the signature.

(c) If an election to change options is made pursuant to this section, the modified allowance shall be reduced in a manner determined by the board to ensure
 that no additional liability shall be incurred by the plan pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 24306.5 by Stats. 2014, Ch. 755, Sec. 54.   (SB 1220)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

24342.

(a) Any member who retired for service under Option 4 or Option 5 with an effective date prior to January 1, 1991, may elect to change Option 4 to Option 6 or Option 5 to Option 7 if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The election is made during the three-month period commencing January 1, 1999, and ending March 31, 1999.

(2) The same beneficiary under Option 4 or Option 5 is named as beneficiary under Option 6 or Option 7.

(3) The change in options is consistent with Sections 22453 and 24322.

(4) The option beneficiary is not afflicted with any known terminal illness.

(5) The option beneficiary has not predeceased the retired member as of the effective date of the change in option.

(6) The election to change the option under this section is received at the system’s headquarters office at least 30 days prior to the death of the option beneficiary.

(b) Failure to satisfy all of the conditions in subdivision (a) shall render the change of election invalid.

(c) The change in options under this section shall be effective on the date the election is signed, provided all the conditions set forth in subdivision (a) are satisfied and the election is
 received at the system’s headquarters office within 30 days after the date of the signature.

(d) The election of a new joint and survivor option under this section is subject to a further modification of the modified retirement allowance. In no event may a retired member elect a joint and survivor option that would result in any additional liability to the fund.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 24306.7 by Stats. 2014, Ch. 755, Sec. 55.   (SB 1220)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

24343.

(a) Any member who retired for service under Option 2 or Option 3 with an effective date prior to January 1, 1991, whose option beneficiary had died prior to January 1, 1995, shall receive, effective January 1, 1999, the retirement allowance without modification for the option if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The retired member is living as of January 1, 1999.

(2) The retired member has not elected a new option beneficiary under Section 24323.

(3) The retirement allowance without modification for the option payable
 as of January 1, 1999, is greater than the amount payable under the option, plus the amounts from annual benefit improvements, ad hoc benefit increases, and payments from the Supplemental Benefit Maintenance Account.

(4) The retired member does not inform the system in writing, on a form provided by the system, within 30 days of receipt of the notification of the change to the retirement allowance without modification for the option, of his or her election to continue to receive the option allowance.

(b) Any member who retired for service under Option 4 or Option 5 with an effective date prior to January 1, 1991, whose option beneficiary had died prior to January 1, 1999, shall receive effective January 1, 1999, the retirement allowance without
 modification for the option if all the following conditions are met:

(1) The retired member is living as of January 1, 1999.

(2) The retired member has not elected a new option beneficiary under Section 24323.

(3) The retirement allowance without modification for the option payable as of January 1, 1999, is greater than the amount payable under the option, plus the amount from annual benefit improvements, ad hoc benefit increases, and payments from the Supplemental Benefit Maintenance Account.

(4) The retired member does not inform the system in writing, on a form provided by the system, within 30 days of receipt of the notification of the change to
 the retirement allowance without modification for the option, of his or her election to continue to receive the option allowance.

(c) The change to the retirement allowance without modification for the option shall be consistent with Section 22453.

(d) A member retired for service who receives the retirement allowance without modification for the option provided under this section shall not elect a new option beneficiary under Section 24323.

(e) The cost of this section shall be paid by the transfer for that purpose of the one-time gain accrued to the State Teachers’ Retirement System from the difference between the contributions received pursuant to Sections 22901 and 22950 in the 1997–98 fiscal year minus
 the normal cost as displayed in the June 30, 1997, actuarial valuation.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 24313 by Stats. 2014, Ch. 755, Sec. 63.   (SB 1220)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

24344.

(a) A member who has a preretirement election of an option in effect on December 31, 1999, may change his or her preretirement election of Option 2, Option 3, Option 4, Option 5, Option 6, or Option 7 to Option 8 without the allowance reduction prescribed in Sections 24309 and 24310, provided the change is made on or after January 1, 2000, and prior to the earlier of July 1, 2000, or the member’s benefit effective date.

(b) If the member elects to change his or her option under this section then the member shall retain the same option and the same option beneficiary as named in the prior preretirement election of an option as one of the options under Option 8. The election to change
 the preretirement election under this section shall be void if not received in the system’s headquarters office at least 30 days prior to the death of the option beneficiary.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2000.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 24312 by Stats. 2014, Ch. 755, Sec. 61.   (SB 1220)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

24345.

(a) A member who retired and elected an option pursuant to Section 24300 may elect to change options, subject to all of the following:

(1) A member who elected Option 2 may elect to change to the 100-percent beneficiary option described in paragraph (1) or the 75-percent beneficiary option described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 24300.1.

(2) A member who elected Option 3, Option 4, or Option 5 may elect to change to the 75-percent beneficiary option described in paragraph (2) or the 50-percent beneficiary option described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 24300.1.

(3) A member who elected Option 6 or Option 7 may elect to change to the 75-percent beneficiary option described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 24300.1.

(4) A member who elected Option 8 may elect to have any designated percentage of his or her unmodified allowance changed in accordance with paragraph (1), (2), or (3).

(5) The election by a member under this section is made on or after January 1, 2007, and prior to July 1, 2007.

(6) The member designates the same beneficiary that was designated under the prior option elected by the member, if the option and beneficiary designation were effective on or before December 31, 2006.

(7) The member and the option beneficiary are not afflicted with a known terminal illness and the member declares, under penalty of perjury under the laws of this state, that to the best of his or her knowledge, he or she and the option beneficiary are not afflicted with a known terminal illness.

(8) The option beneficiary has not predeceased the member as of the effective date of the change in the option by the member.

(b) The change in the option by the member shall be effective on the date the election is signed, provided that the election is on a properly executed form provided by the system and that election is received at the system’s headquarters office within 30 days after the date the election is signed.

(c) After receipt of a member’s election document, the system shall mail an acknowledgment notice to the member that sets forth the new option elected by the member.

(d) If the member and the option beneficiary are alive and not afflicted with a known terminal illness, a member may cancel the election to change options and elect to receive the benefit according to the preexisting option election. After cancellation, the member may elect to make a one-time change from the preexisting option to any other option provided by and subject to the restrictions of paragraph (1), (2), (3), or (4) of subdivision (a). The cancellation or the cancellation and one-time change shall be made on a properly executed form provided by the system and shall be received at the system’s headquarters
 office no later than 30 calendar days following the date of mailing of the acknowledgment notice. If the member elects to make the one-time change provided by this subdivision, the change shall be effective as of the member’s signature date on the initial election to change.

(e) If the system is unable to mail an acknowledgment notice to the member on or before June 1, 2007, or prior to the end of the election period, provided that the member and the option beneficiary are alive and not afflicted with a known terminal illness, the system shall allow a member to cancel the election to change options and elect to receive the benefit according to the preexisting option election. After cancellation, the member may elect to make a one-time change from the preexisting option to any other option provided by and subject to the restrictions of paragraph
 (1), (2), (3), or (4) of subdivision (a). The cancellation or the cancellation and one-time change may be made after the end of the election period if it is made on a properly executed form provided by the system and is received at the system’s headquarters office no later than 30 days following the date of the acknowledgment notice. If the member elects to make the one-time change provided by this subdivision, the change shall be effective as of the member’s signature date on the initial election to change.

(f) If the member elects to change his or her option as described in subdivision (a), the retirement allowance of the member shall be modified in a manner determined by the board to prevent any additional liability to the plan.

(g) The member shall not change options in derogation
 of a spouse’s or former spouse’s community property rights as specified in a court order.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 24300.2 by Stats. 2014, Ch. 755, Sec. 42.   (SB 1220)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

24346.

(a) A member who has a preretirement election of an option in effect on December 31, 2006, pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 24300 may change his or her preretirement election to an option described in paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 24300.1 without the allowance reduction described in Sections 24309 and 24310, provided the change is made on or after January 1, 2007, and prior to July 1, 2007.

(b) A member who has a preretirement election of Option 8 as described in Section 24300 in effect on December 31, 2006, and in that Option 8 election has an option pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive, of subdivision
 (a) of Section 24300, may change any of the options under paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 24300 to an option described in paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 24300.1 without the allowance reduction described in Sections 24309 and 24310, if change is made on or after January 1, 2007, and prior to July 1, 2007. A member may not change the portion of the unmodified benefit that would be modified pursuant to that prior option.

(c) The election to change the option by a member as described in this section shall be subject to all of the following:

(1) The member may not change the option beneficiary that was designated in the prior preretirement option election.

(2) The change in options under this section shall be effective on the date the election is signed, provided that the election is on a properly executed form provided by the system and received at the system’s headquarters office within 30 days of the date of the signature.

(d) If the member elects to change options as described in this section, the age of the member and the option beneficiary on the effective date of the prior preretirement option election shall be the age used to calculate the member’s benefit at the time of retirement.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 24312.1 by Stats. 2014, Ch. 755, Sec. 62.   (SB 1220)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

24347.

(a) A member who retired and elected an option pursuant to this chapter and designated his or her same-sex spouse or same-sex former spouse as option beneficiary may elect to change his or her option subject to the following:

(1) A member who elected the 100 percent beneficiary option or the 50 percent beneficiary option may elect to change his or her option to the 75 percent beneficiary option described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 24300.1, provided the member’s same-sex spouse or same-sex former spouse is more than exactly 19 years younger than the member.

(2) (A) A member who elected the compound option may elect to change the option designated for his or her same-sex spouse or same-sex former spouse within the compound option to the 100 percent beneficiary option described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 24300.1, provided the member’s same-sex spouse or same-sex former spouse is more than exactly 10 years younger than the member, or the 75 percent beneficiary option described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 24300.1, provided the member’s same-sex spouse or same-sex former spouse is more than exactly 19 years younger than the member.

(B) If a member elects to change the option designated for his or her same-sex spouse or same-sex former spouse within the compound option, the member may also elect to change the option designated to any other option
 beneficiary or beneficiaries within the compound option to the 100 percent beneficiary option, the 75 percent beneficiary option, or the 50 percent beneficiary option described in paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 24300.1.

(C) If a member elects to change the option designated for his or her same-sex spouse or same-sex former spouse within the compound option, the member may also elect to change the percentage of his or her unmodified allowance designated to the option beneficiary or beneficiaries. The percent of the allowance that is not modified by an option, if any, shall be payable to the member. The sum of all percentages specified for the option beneficiary or beneficiaries and the member’s remaining unmodified allowance, if any, shall equal 100 percent.

(D) Any change made pursuant to this paragraph shall be subject to the requirements and restrictions of the compound option described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 24300.1 and shall not be construed to allow a member to cancel his or her compound option.

(3) The option change made by the member pursuant to this section is made on or after July 1, 2015, and on or before December 31, 2015.

(4) The member married a same-sex spouse, the marriage is or was recognized by the United States government, any state government, or any foreign government, and his or her same-sex spouse or same-sex former spouse was designated as his or her option beneficiary prior to July 1, 2015.

(5) The same-sex
 spouse or same-sex former spouse is a current option beneficiary, and the member designates the same option beneficiary or beneficiaries that were designated for the prior option elected by the member.

(6) The option beneficiary or beneficiaries have not predeceased the member as of the effective date of the option change made by the member pursuant to this section.

(b) The option change made by a member pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be deemed effective as of the effective date of the prior option elections or June 26, 2013, whichever is later.

(c) The option change made by the member pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be on a properly executed form provided by the system subject to the following
 requirements:

(1) The form is signed and dated by the member and the member’s spouse, if applicable, on or after July 1, 2015, and on or before December 31, 2015.

(2) The date the form is received at the system’s headquarters office is within 30 calendar days after the date of the member’s signature and within 30 calendar days after the date of the spouse’s signature, if applicable.

(d) After receipt of the member’s election, the system shall mail an acknowledgment notice to the member that set forth the new option elected by the member.

(e) A member may cancel an option change made pursuant to subdivision (a) and elect to receive his or her
 benefit according to his or her prior option election provided the requirements of paragraphs (5) and (6) of subdivision (a) are still met. The cancellation shall become effective as of the date of the initial option change pursuant to subdivision (b) subject to the following requirements:

(1) The cancellation is made on a properly executed form provided by the system.

(2) The form includes the signatures of the member and his or her spouse, if applicable, and the signatures are dated.

(3) The form is received at the system’s headquarters office within 30 calendar days after the date of the acknowledgment notice described in subdivision (d), regardless of whether the form is received after December 31, 2015.

(f) A member may cancel an initial option change made pursuant to subdivision (a) and elect to make one subsequent change from his or her option election to any other option provided by and subject to the restrictions of subdivision (a). The subsequent change shall become effective as of the date of the initial option change pursuant to subdivision (b) and subject to the following requirements:

(1) The cancellation and subsequent change are made on a properly executed form provided by the system.

(2) The form includes the signatures of the member and his or her spouse, if applicable, and the signatures are dated.

(3) The form is received at the system’s
 headquarters office within 30 calendar days after the date of the acknowledgment notice described in subdivision (d), regardless of whether the form is received after December 31, 2015.

(g) If a member elects to change his or her option as described in subdivision (a) or (f), the retirement allowance of the member shall be modified in a manner determined by the board to prevent any additional liability to the plan.

(h) A member shall not change options in derogation of a spouse’s or former spouse’s community property rights as specified in a court order.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 755, Sec. 64.   (SB 1220)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

24348.

(a) A member who has a preretirement option pursuant to Section 24307 in effect on July 1, 2015, and designated his or her same-sex spouse or same-sex former spouse as option beneficiary may elect to change his or her option subject to the following:

(1) A member who elected the 100 percent beneficiary option
 or the 50 percent beneficiary option may elect to change his or her option to the 75 percent beneficiary option described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 24300.1 provided the member’s same-sex spouse or same-sex former spouse is more than exactly 19 years younger than the member.

(2) (A) A member who elected the compound option may elect to change the option designated for his or her same-sex spouse or same-sex former spouse within the compound option to the 100 percent beneficiary option described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 24300.1 provided the member’s same-sex spouse or same-sex former spouse is more than exactly 10 years younger than the member, or the 75 percent beneficiary option described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 24300.1 provided the
 member’s same-sex spouse or same-sex former spouse is more than exactly 19 years younger than the member.

(B) If a member elects to change the option designated for his or her same-sex spouse or same-sex former spouse within the compound option, the member may also elect to change the option designated to any other option beneficiary or beneficiaries within the compound option to the 100 percent beneficiary option, the 75 percent beneficiary option, or the 50 percent beneficiary option described in paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 24300.1.

(C) If a member elects to change the option designated for his or her same-sex spouse or same-sex former spouse within the compound option, the member may also elect to change the percentage of his or her
 unmodified allowance designated to the option beneficiary or beneficiaries. The percent of the allowance that is not modified by an option, if any, shall be payable to the member. The sum of all percentages specified for the option beneficiary or beneficiaries and the member’s remaining unmodified allowance, if any, shall equal 100 percent.

(D) Any change made pursuant to this paragraph shall be subject to the requirements and restrictions of the compound option described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 24300.1 and shall not be construed to allow a member to cancel his or her compound option.

(3) The option change made by the member pursuant to this section is made on or after July 1, 2015, and on or before December 31, 2015.

(4) The member married a same-sex spouse, the marriage is or was recognized by the United States government, any state government, or any foreign government, and his or her same-sex spouse or same-sex former spouse was designated as his or her option beneficiary prior to July 1, 2015.

(5) The same-sex spouse or same-sex former spouse is a current option beneficiary, and the member designates the same option beneficiary or beneficiaries that were designated for the prior option elected by the member.

(6) The option beneficiary or beneficiaries have not predeceased the member as of the effective date of the option change made by the member pursuant to this section.

(b) The option change made by a member pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be deemed effective as of the effective date of the prior election or June 26, 2013, whichever is later.

(c) The option change made by the member pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be on a properly executed form provided by the system subject to the following requirements:

(1) The form is signed and dated by the member and the member’s spouse, if applicable, on or after July 1, 2015, and on or before December 31, 2015.

(2) The date the form is
 received at the system’s headquarters office is within 30 calendar days after the date of the member’s signature and within 30 calendar days after the date of the spouse’s signature, if applicable.

(d) A preretirement option change made pursuant to this section will not result in the allowance reduction described in Sections 24309 and 24310.

(e) If a member elects to change options pursuant to this section, the age of the member and the option beneficiary or beneficiaries on the effective date of the prior preretirement option election shall be the age used to calculate the member’s benefit at the time of retirement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 755, Sec. 65.   (SB 1220)   Effective January 1, 2015.)